Utah statutes.
17-18a-402.   Pretrial responsibilities.

(1) (a)  A public prosecutor shall:

(i)  institute proceedings before the proper court:

(A)  for the arrest of a person charged with a public offense; or

(B)  if the prosecutor has probable cause to believe that a public offense has been committed and a grand jury has been convened by a court;

(ii)  draw all indictments and information for offenses against:

(A)  the laws of the state occurring within the county; and

(B)  the criminal ordinances of the county;

(iii)  cause all persons under indictment or informed against to be speedily arraigned for crimes charged; and

(iv)  issue subpoenas for all witnesses for the state or for the county in the prosecution of a criminal ordinance.

(b)  A public prosecutor described in Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B) shall:

(i)  assist and attend the deliberations of the grand jury; and

(ii)  prepare all necessary indictments and arrange for the subpoena of witnesses to appear before the grand jury.

(2)  The public prosecutor may:

(a)  examine as to the sufficiency of an appearance bond that may be tendered to the court; and

(b)  upon a court order:

(i)  institute proceedings for the recovery upon forfeiture of a bond running to the state or county; and

(ii)  enforce the collection of a bond described in Subsection (2)(b)(i).

(3)  The public prosecutor is authorized to grant transactional immunity to a witness for violation of a state statute or county criminal ordinance.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

